Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.050

Lease of buses to transport children with disabilities and elderly—Directors to authorize.

The directors of school districts may authorize leases under RCW 28A.160.040 through 28A.160.060: PROVIDED, That such leases do not conflict with regular school purposes.

[ 1990 c 33 s 134; 1971 c 78 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.24.111.]